Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
Nonprofit Corporations

Editor's note:

(1) Articles 20 to 29 were numbered as article 24 of chapter 31, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to these articles prior to their repeal in 1997, effective July 1, 1998, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

(2) Current provisions concerning nonprofit corporations are located in articles 121 to 137 of this title.